src/fst/morphology/affixes/particles.lexc
!! # Particles
!! ----
!! Komi Particles


LEXICON PCLE_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PCLE_NEG
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Aux+Neg: K/COP_PL ;

LEXICON PcleIntens
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Intens: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ONOM_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Ideoph: WordEnd ;

!LEXICON DESCR_End
! DescrTag ;
LEXICON DESCR_
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@ 
+Ideoph: WordEnd ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
